src/morphology/stems/nob-propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun-nob-nocomp

AKP PROP-org ;
AMI PROP-org ;
ANC PROP-org ;
ANSI PROP-org ;
AOF PROP-org ;
AP PROP-org ;
AUF PROP-org ;
